apertium-yaq.yaq.twoc
Alphabet

%[%-redup%]:0
%[%+redup%]:0 

%[%-bd%]:0
%[%+bd%]:0

%[%-ubd%]:0

;

Rules

"Prevent multiple reduplications"
%[%-redup%]:0 /<= _ :* %[%-redup%]:0 ;

"Match reduplication marking"
%[%-redup%]:0 /<= _ ;
    except _ :* %[%+redup%]:0 ;

"Match reduplication marking, reverse"
%[%+redup%]:0 /<= _ ;
    except %[%-redup%]:0 :* _ ; 

"Require bounded if bounding"
%[%-bd%]:0 /<= _ ;
    except _ :* %[%+bd%]:0 ;

"Require bounded if bounding, reverse"
%[%+bd%]:0 /<= _ ;
    except %[%-bd%]:0 :* _ ; 

"Require no bounded if unbounding"
%[%-ubd%]:0 /<= _ :* %[%+bd%]:0 ;
